South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5745.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-5-365 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (G) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is unlawful for any person to buy, receive, handle, pack, process, ship, consign, land, possess, sell, barter, or trade red snapper (Lutjanus campechanus) for commercial purposes within this State. Any red snapper possessed or landed in violation of this subsection is considered contraband and must be disposed of pursuant to Section 50-5-325(L). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----